Washington statutes.
RCW 18.240.070

Applicant certification—Fees.

The secretary shall certify an applicant on forms provided by the secretary. Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250. The fee must accompany the application.

[ 2007 c 70 s 8.]